Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 1. Programs and Courses of Instruction Generally.
§ 22.1-208.01.
Character education required.

Each school board shall establish, within its existing programs or as a separate program, a character education program in its schools, which may occur during the regular school year, during the summer in a youth development academy offered by the school division, or both. The Department of Education shall develop curricular guidelines for school divisions to use in establishing a character education program through a summer youth development academy. The purpose of the character education program shall be to instill in students civic virtues and personal character traits so as to improve the learning environment, promote student achievement, reduce disciplinary problems, and develop civic-minded students of high character. The components of each program shall be developed in cooperation with the students, their parents, and the community at large. The basic character traits taught may include (i) trustworthiness, including honesty, integrity, reliability, and loyalty; (ii) respect, including the precepts of the Golden Rule, tolerance, and courtesy; (iii) responsibility, including hard work, economic self-reliance, accountability, diligence, perseverance, and self-control; (iv) fairness, including justice, consequences of bad behavior, principles of nondiscrimination, and freedom from prejudice; (v) caring, including kindness, empathy, compassion, consideration, generosity, and charity; and (vi) citizenship, including patriotism, the Pledge of Allegiance, respect for the American flag, concern for the common good, respect for authority and the law, and community-mindedness.Classroom instruction may be used to supplement a character education program; however, each program shall be interwoven into the school procedures and environment and structured to instruct primarily through example, illustration, and participation, in such a way as to complement the Standards of Learning. The program shall also address the inappropriateness of bullying, as defined in § 22.1-276.01.This provision is intended to educate students regarding those core civic values and virtues that are efficacious to civilized society and are common to the diverse social, cultural, and religious groups of the Commonwealth. Consistent with this purpose, Virginia’s civic values, which are the principles articulated in the Bill of Rights (Article I) of the Constitution of Virginia and the ideals reflected in the seal of the Commonwealth, as described in §

1-500

, may be taught as representative of such civic values. Nothing herein shall be construed as requiring or authorizing the indoctrination in any particular religious or political belief.

The Board of Education shall establish criteria for character education programs consistent with the provisions of this section. The Department of Education shall assist school divisions in implementing character education programs and practices that are designed to promote the development of personal qualities as set forth in this section and the Standards of Quality and that will improve family and community involvement in the public schools. With such funds as are made available for this purpose, the Department of Education shall provide resources and technical assistance to school divisions regarding successful character education programs and shall (i) identify and analyze effective character education programs and practices and (ii) collect and disseminate among school divisions information regarding such programs and practices and potential funding and support sources. The Department of Education may also provide resources supporting professional development for administrators and teachers in the delivery of any character education programs.

The Department of Education shall award, with such funds as are appropriated for this purpose, grants to school boards for the implementation of innovative character education programs, including a summer youth development academy.

History.

1998, c. 725; 1999, c. 944; 2003, c. 777; 2005, cc. 461, 484, 839; 2012, c. 703; 2013, c. 575.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, c. 777, cl. 2, provides: “That school boards, at their discretion, may accept contributions in cash or in-kind from any person, as defined in § 1-13.19 [see now §

1-230

], to defray the costs of implementing this provision.”

The 1999 amendment

added subsection A and redesignated the former paragraph as subsection B, and in said subsection, added the first sentence, inserted “this section and” preceding “the Standards,” substituted “the Board of Education shall also establish” for “there shall be established,” substituted “The Board” for “This unit,” substituted “programs and” for “programs. The unit,” and substituted “The Board” for “Such unit”; and added subsection C.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 777 added the second sentence of the third paragraph of subsection A.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 461 and 484 are identical, and added the last sentence in the second paragraph of subsection A.

The 2005 amendment by c. 839, effective October 1, 2005, substituted “1-500” for “7.1-26” in the last paragraph of subsection A.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 703, in subsection A, rewrote the first sentence and added the second sentence; in subsection B, substituted “The Department of Education shall assist” for “To assist” at the beginning, and deleted “the Board of Education shall also establish, within the Department of Education, the Commonwealth Character Initiative” at the end, of the second sentence, substituted “With such funds as are made available for this purpose, the Department of Education shall” for “The Board shall” at the beginning of the third sentence, and substituted “The Department of Education may” for “The Board may” at the beginning of the fourth sentence; and substituted “The Department of Education shall” for “The Board shall” at the beginning, and added “including a summer youth development academy” at the end, of subsection C.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 575, in subsection A, substituted “§ 22.1-276.01” for “the Student Conduct Policy Guidelines adopted by the Board of Education pursuant to § 22.1-279.6” at the end of the second paragraph, and “that” for “which” in the first sentence in the last paragraph.

Law Review.

For Comment, “Spelling out LGBT: Enumerating Sexual Orientation in Virginia’s Anti-Bullying Law,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1373 (2013).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Discrimination. —

Because the power to protect students and employees from discrimination in the public school system is a power fairly implied from the express grant of authority to school boards under Article VIII, § 7 of the Constitution of Virginia and from the specific authority granted to boards by the General Assembly in §§ 22.1-28, 22.1-78 and 22.1-253.13:7, the Dillon Rule does not prevent school boards from amending their antidiscrimination policies to prohibit discrimination on the basis of sexual orientation and gender identity. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Adam P. Ebbin, Member, Senate of Virginia, No. 14-080, 2015 Va. AG LEXIS 9 (3/4/15).

§ 22.1-208.02.
Culturally Relevant and Inclusive Education Practices Advisory Committee.

The Department of Education, in consultation with the Commonwealth’s Director of Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion, shall establish and appoint such members as deemed appropriate to the Culturally Relevant and Inclusive Education Practices Advisory Committee (the Advisory Committee) for the purpose of strengthening culturally relevant education practices and supporting anti-bias education and response in the Commonwealth. The Advisory Committee shall include but not be limited to a geographically, ethnically, and religiously diverse representation of teachers, curriculum specialists, principals, superintendents, advocates, higher education institutions, parents, legislators, and community-based organizations. The Advisory Committee shall report its recommendations to the Board of Education, the Governor, and the Chairpersons of the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education and Health no later than July 1, 2021. The Committee shall issue interim reports as it deems necessary.

The Advisory Committee shall provide standards recommendations to the Virginia Department of Education, and they shall be considered by the Board of Education, during the 2021-2022 review of the history and social science Standards of Learning. Such recommendations shall include:

The historical underpinnings of the Holocaust and other historical genocides in the context of how increased lower levels of hate, ridicule, and dehumanization led to larger acts of violence and state-sponsored discrimination and violence;

Slavery, anti-Semitism, Islamophobia, and other forms of historical dehumanizing injustice and discrimination;

The ignored and untold history of the indigenous people of Virginia and North America; and

The untold histories of other groups historically underrepresented in American and world history.

The Advisory Committee shall provide recommendations for the issuance of Board of Education guidelines for local school division staff, including teachers and school counselors, to offer age-appropriate anti-bias education to students. The recommendations for such guidelines shall include:

Recognition that anti-bias and anti-discrimination education is the work and responsibility of all staff within the local school division;

An emphasis on diversity and building a community of empathy, respect, understanding, and connection;

Examination of how lower levels of hate, ridicule, and dehumanization lead to larger acts of violence, discrimination and violence;

Acknowledgment of inequity on the individual level, such as biased speech and harassment, and injustice at the institutional or systemic level, such as discrimination, and the harmful impact of inequity and injustice on the community, historically and today;

School-based and classroom-based responses, which are student centered and proven effective, to various forms of racism, bigotry, and discrimination through empathy, respect, understanding, and connection; and

Updates to the Department of Education’s teacher’s manual, as required by action taken by the 2009 Session of the General Assembly, that emphasizes the causes and ramifications of the Holocaust and genocide.

The Advisory Committee shall provide recommendations on meaningful professional development with school personnel related to culturally relevant and inclusive education practices. In addition to the Board of Education, the Governor, and the Chairpersons of the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education and Health, these recommendations shall also be provided to the Advisory Board on Teacher Education and Licensure and the State Council for Higher Education in Virginia. This shall include but not be limited to considerations for:

The policies and regulations governing teacher preparation programs; and

The policies and regulations governing teacher licensure and professional development requirements for licensure renewal.

History.

2020, cc. 572, 573.

§§ 22.1-208.1 through 22.1-208.2:1.
Repealed by Acts 2011, c. 216, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 22.1-208.1, which established the Virginia Reading to Learn Project, was derived from Acts 1985, c. 491; 1991, c. 178; 1995, c. 318.

Former § 22.1-208.2, which established the Virginia Reading Recovery Program, was derived from Acts 1994, c. 654.

Former § 22.1-208.2:1, which established the Community of Readers Program, was derived from Acts 1995, c. 232.

§ 22.1-208.2:1.1.
Repealed by Acts 2004, c. 872, cl. 4, effective May 4, 2005.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 872, cl. 4, provides: “That notwithstanding the revisions made in the first enactment, § 22.1-208.2:1.1 of the Code of Virginia is repealed if no specific appropriation has been made to the Reading Incentive Grants Program for fiscal year 2004 or fiscal year 2005.” No appropriation was made.

§ 22.1-208.2:2.
Repealed by Acts 2011, c. 216, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 22.1-208.2:2, which established the School-To-Work Transition Grants Program and Fund, was derived from Acts 1996, c. 241.

§ 22.1-208.2:3.
Repealed by Acts 2005, c. 741, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 22.1-208.2:3, which established the Banking-at-School Partnership Program, was enacted by Acts 2002, c. 774.

§ 22.1-208.2:4.
Expired.

Editor’s note.

This section was enacted by Acts 2005, c. 33. Acts 2005, c. 33, cl. 2, provided: “That this act shall expire on July 1, 2007, if no gifts, donations, grants, bequests, or other funds effectuating the purposes of this act are received by such date.” The funding was not provided.

§ 22.1-209.
Employment counseling and placement services.

Each school board shall make available to secondary students employment counseling and placement services to furnish information relating to the employment opportunities available to students graduating from or leaving the public schools in the school division. Such information shall include all types of employment opportunities, including, but not limited to, apprenticeships, the military, career education schools, and the teaching profession.

No fee, compensation or other consideration shall be charged to or received from any student utilizing such services.

In providing such services, the school board shall consult and cooperate with the Virginia Employment Commission, the Department of Labor and Industry, local business and labor organizations, and such career schools as may be approved by the Board.

The Board of Education may recommend methods for providing such services. The State Department of Education may provide assistance to school divisions in establishing and providing such services upon request.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-40.1; 1975, c. 147; 1980, c. 559; 1990, c. 797; 1991, c. 295; 1999, c. 452.

The 1999 amendment,

in subsection A, substituted “Such information” for “which” deleted “and” preceding “career education,” and added “and the teaching profession” at the end.

§§ 22.1-209.01 through 22.1-209.1:1.
Repealed by Acts 2011, c. 216, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 22.1-209.01, which established school-to-work transition programs, was derived from Acts 1995, c. 274.

Former § 22.1-209.1, pertaining to model programs in elementary developmental guidance and counseling, was derived from Acts 1984, c. 197.

Former § 22.1-209.1:1, pertaining to noncompetitive grants program for school dropout prevention, was derived from Acts 1990, c. 797; 1991, c. 295.

§ 22.1-209.1:2.
Regional alternative education programs for certain students.

With such funds as may be appropriated for this purpose, the Board of Education shall establish a program consisting of regional alternative education options for elementary, middle, and high school students in compliance with subdivision D 7 of § 22.1-253.13:1 who (i) have committed an offense in violation of school board policies relating to weapons, alcohol or drugs, or intentional injury to another person, or against whom a petition or warrant has been filed alleging such acts or school board charges alleging such policy violations are pending; (ii) have been expelled from school attendance or have received one suspension for an entire semester, or have received two or more long-term suspensions within one school year; or (iii) have been released from a juvenile correctional center and have been identified by the Superintendent of the Department of Juvenile Justice’s Division of Education and the relevant division superintendent as requiring a regional alternative education program. Based on available space, a student may also be administratively assigned to a regional alternative education program either at the request of the parent and with the consent of the division superintendent or by the division superintendent after written notice to the student and his parent. Such notice of the opportunity for the student and/or his parent to participate in a hearing conducted by the division superintendent or his designee regarding such placement shall be issued and the assignment shall be final unless altered by the school board, upon timely written petition, in accordance with regulations of the school board, by the student or his parent, for a review of the record by the school board. However, no child shall be assigned to any regional alternative education program described in this section for more than one school year without an annual assessment of the placement to determine the appropriateness of transitioning the child into the school division’s regular program.

Applications for grants shall include the following components:

An agreement executed by two or more school divisions and approval of their respective governing bodies to offer a regional alternative education option as provided in subsection A, and a plan for the apportionment of responsibilities for the administration, management, and support of the program, including, but not limited to, the facilities and location for the program, daily operation and oversight, staffing, instructional materials and resources, transportation, funding and in-kind services, and the program of instruction.

A procedure for obtaining the participation in or support for the program, as may be determined, of the parents, guardian or other person having charge or control of a child placed in the program.

An interagency agreement for cooperation executed by the local departments of health and social services or welfare; the juvenile and domestic relations district court; law-enforcement agencies; institutions of higher education and other postsecondary training programs; professional and community organizations; the business and religious communities; dropout prevention and substance abuse prevention programs; community services boards located in the applicants’ respective jurisdictions; and the Department of Juvenile Justice.

A curriculum developed for intensive, accelerated instruction designed to establish high standards and academic achievement for participating students.

An emphasis on building self-esteem and the promotion of personal and social responsibility.

A low pupil/teacher ratio to promote a high level of interaction between the students and the teacher.

An extended day program, where appropriate, to facilitate remediation; tutoring; counseling; organized, age-appropriate, developmental education for elementary and middle school children; and opportunities that enhance acculturation and permit students to improve their social and interpersonal relationship skills.

Community outreach to build strong school, business, and community partnerships, and to promote parental involvement in the educational process of participating children.

Specific, measurable goals and objectives and an evaluation component to determine the program’s effectiveness in reducing acts of crime and violence by students, the dropout rate, the number of youth committed to juvenile correctional centers, and recidivism; and in increasing the academic achievement levels and rehabilitative success of participating students, admission to institutions of higher education and other postsecondary education and training programs, and improving staff retention rates.

The number of children who may be assigned to the regional alternative education program during the school year.

A plan for transitioning the enrolled students into the relevant school division’s regular program.

A current program of staff development and training.

Beginning with the first year of program implementation, the Department of Education shall be entitled to deduct annually from the locality’s share for the education of its students a sum equal to the actual local expenditure per pupil for the support of those students placed by the relevant school division in any such program. The amount of the actual transfers shall be based on data accumulated during the prior school year.

A school board shall require written notification to the pupil’s parent, guardian, or other person having charge or control, when a pupil commits an offense in violation of school board policies, which school officials determine was committed without the willful intent to violate such policies, or when the offense did not endanger the health and safety of the individual or other persons, of the nature of the offense no later than two school days following its occurrence. A school board shall require the principal of the school where the child is in attendance or other appropriate school personnel to develop appropriate measures, in conjunction with the pupil’s parent or guardian, for correcting such behavior.

For the purposes of this section, “regional alternative education program” means a program supported and implemented by two or more school divisions which are either geographically contiguous or have a community of interest.

For the purposes of this section, “one school year” means no more than 180 teaching days.

History.

1993, cc. 819, 856; 1994, c. 762; 1995, c. 533; 1996, cc. 755, 914; 2000, c. 739; 2004, cc. 939, 955; 2009, cc. 792, 802; 2010, c. 61; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, cc. 819 and 856, which enacted this section, in cl. 2 provided: “That the provisions of this section shall expire on July 1, 1997.” However, Acts 1997, c. 597 provided that the second enactments of cc. 819 and 856 are repealed. Therefore, this section did not expire on July 1, 1997.

Acts 1996, cc. 755 and 914, cls. 7 provide: that “the provisions of this act shall apply to offenses committed and to records created and proceedings held with respect to those offenses on or after July 1, 1996.”

Acts 2004, cc. 939 and 955, cl. 2 provides: “That no educational standard set forth in this act, for which state funding is required, shall take effect unless the state’s share of funding that standard is included in the 2004 Appropriation Act, passed during the 2004 Session of the General Assembly and signed by the Governor.” See Editor’s notes under § 22.1-253.13:2 and Acts 2004, Sp. Sess. I, c. 4, Items 146 B 6 b and 146 C 2 j.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 739, substituted “elementary, middle, and high school students” for “school age children” in the first sentence of subsection A, and added the second paragraph of subsection B.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 939 and 955 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “subdivision D 6” for “subdivision D 8” and substituted “10” for “ten.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 792 substituted “a regional alternative education” for “an alternative education” in the first sentence of subsection A and in subdivision B 1; in subsection A, inserted “regional” preceding “alternative education options” and added the present second and third sentences; and substituted “ ‘regional pilot alternative education program’ or ‘regional alernative education program’ ” for “ ‘regional pilot program’ ” in subsection F.

The 2009 amendment by c. 802 substituted “D 7 of § 22.1-253.13:1” for “D 6 § 22.1-253.13:1” in subsection A.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 61 deleted the last three sentences of subsection A and the first two paragraphs of subsection B; substituted “to offer a regional” for “to pilot a regional” in subdivision B 1; deleted “pilot” preceding “program” at the end of the first sentence of subsection C; deleted former subsection E and redesignated the following subsections accordingly; and in subsection E, deleted “ ‘regional pilot alternative education program’ or” preceding “ ‘regional alternative education program.’ ”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 99, are identical, and substituted “Department of Juvenile Justice’s Division of Education” for “Department of Correctional Education” near the middle of subsection A; and substituted “Department of Juvenile Justice” for “Department of Correctional Education” at the end of subdivision B 3.

§ 22.1-209.1:3.
Advancement Via Individual Determination (AVID) Programs.

With such funds as may be appropriated by the General Assembly for this purpose, local school boards may establish Advancement Via Individual Determination Programs in their respective school divisions to prepare at-risk students enrolled in the secondary grades in the public schools of the school division for postsecondary education eligibility.

Any school board adopting the Advancement Via Individual Determination Program shall establish policies and guidelines to ensure compliance with the provisions of this section. Programs established pursuant to subsection A shall include the following components:

A procedure for identifying at-risk students enrolled in the secondary grades in the public schools of the school division who demonstrate academic potential, a desire to attend college, and the willingness to pursue a rigorous academic program of study leading to eligibility for college admission;

A procedure for obtaining participation in or support for the program by the parent, guardian or other person having charge or control of a child engaged in the program;

An agreement executed with an associate-degree-granting institution of higher education or a baccalaureate institution of higher education located within or in the proximity of the school division to provide relevant support services including, but not limited to, access to advanced course work, student mentorships and tutorials, and cultural and enrichment experiences;

A curriculum developed for intensive, accelerated instruction designed to establish high standards and academic achievement for participating students;

An emphasis on college preparation and college awareness, access to advanced level college preparatory courses at the high school level, building self-esteem and the promotion of personal and social responsibility, the availability of support services for students enrolled in the AVID Program, and the development and fostering of a positive attitude toward learning and the advantages of higher education;

A low pupil-teacher ratio to promote a high level of interaction between the students and the teacher;

A current program of staff development and training in the organizational structure, instructional methods, strategies, and process used in and unique to the AVID Program for all teachers and administrators assigned to the program;

Community outreach to build strong school, business, and community partnerships, and to promote parental involvement in the educational process of participating children;

Specific, measurable goals and objectives and an evaluation component to determine the program’s effectiveness in preparing students participating in the program for college, increasing academic achievement, and lessening the need for remediation of such students who attend college.

Upon completion of the initial school year of the Advancement Via Individual Determination Program and at least annually thereafter, each school board implementing such program shall require submission of interim evaluation reports of the program. If funded by an appropriation pursuant to subsection A, each school board having an Advancement Via Individual Determination Program shall report the status, effectiveness, and results of such program no later than November 30 of the year following the completion of the initial school year to the Board of Education, which shall transmit such reports to the Governor and the General Assembly.

History.

1994, c. 864; 2005, c. 633; 2016, cc. 720, 750.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission,
the following changes were made to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588: substituted “postsecondary” for “post-secondary” in subsection A; and substituted “an associate-degree-granting institution of higher education or a baccalaureate” for “a two-year or four-year” in subdivision B 3.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 633 deleted “of this section” following “subsection A” in subsection B; in subsection C, added “If funded by an appropriation pursuant to subsection A” at the beginning of the last sentence and deleted “pursuant to subsection A of this section” following “Individual Determination Program” and “and annually thereafter” following “the initial school year.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 720 and 750 are identical, and deleted “or the advanced studies program” following “program of study” in subdivision B 1.

§ 22.1-209.1:4.
Repealed by Acts 2000, c. 1059, cl. 2, effective June 30, 2002.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, c. 1059, cl. 2 provides: “That § 22.1-209.1:4, as it is currently effective and as it shall become effective, is repealed on June 30, 2002, unless the Appropriation Act of 2001 or 2002 includes funds to effectuate its provisions as set forth in this act, such funds are approved by the 2001 or 2002 Session of the General Assembly and signed into law by the Governor.” No funds were appropriated.

This section was amended by Acts 1998, cc. 602 and 627, effective July 1, 2003. Those amendments will not be effectuated as a result of the repeal of the section by Acts 2000, c. 1059.

Former § 22.1-209.1:4, which created the Virginia Innovative Remedial Education Pilot Program, was enacted by Acts 1997, c. 655, and amended by Acts 1998, c. 902.

§ 22.1-209.1:5.
Expired.

Editor’s note.

This section was enacted by Acts 1998, c. 878, and expired July 1, 2003, pursuant to Acts 1998, c. 878, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2000, c. 241, cl. 1.

§ 22.1-209.1:6.
Repealed by Acts 2011, c. 216, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 22.1-209.1:6, pertaining to pilot discretionary programs for certain disruptive students, was derived from Acts 1999, c. 446.

§ 22.1-209.1:7.
Repealed by Acts 2004, c. 872, cl. 5, effective May 4, 2005.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 872, cl. 5, provides: “That notwithstanding the revisions made in the first enactment, § 22.1-209.1:7 of the Code of Virginia is repealed if no specific appropriation has been made to the Families in Education Incentive Grants Program for fiscal year 2004 or fiscal year 2005.” No appropriation was made.

Former § 22.1-209.1:7, which established the Families in Education Incentive Grants Program and Fund, was enacted by Acts 1999, c. 447.

§ 22.1-209.1:8.
Expired.

Editor’s note.

This section was enacted by Acts 1999, c. 426, and amended by Acts 2001, c. 483, and expired July 1, 2004, pursuant to Acts 1999, c. 426, cl. 2.

§ 22.1-209.1:9.
Repealed by Acts 2004, c. 872, cl. 6, effective May 4, 2005.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 872, cl. 6, provides: “That notwithstanding the second enactment, § 22.1-209.1:9 of the Code of Virginia is repealed if no specific appropriation has been made to the Community-Based Intervention Program for Suspended and Expelled Students for fiscal year 2004 or fiscal year 2005.” No appropriation was made.

Former § 22.1-209.1:9, which established the Community-Based Intervention Program for Suspended and Expelled Students, was enacted by Acts 1999, c. 440, and amended by Acts 2001, c. 483.

§ 22.1-209.1:10.
Repealed by Acts 2004, c. 872, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 22.1-209.1:10, which created the Community-Based Intervention Program for Suspended and Expelled Students Fund, was enacted by was enacted by Acts 1999, c. 440.

§ 22.1-209.2.
Programs and teachers in regional detention homes, certain local detention homes and state agencies and institutions.

The Board shall prepare and supervise the implementation in regional detention homes and local detention homes a program designed to educate and train the children detained in the homes. In addition, the Board shall supervise those programs of evaluation, education, and training provided to school-age children by the Department of Health, the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, the children’s teaching hospital associated with the Eastern Virginia Medical School, the Virginia Commonwealth University Health System Authority, the children’s teaching hospital associated with the Virginia Commonwealth University Health System Authority, and the University of Virginia Hospitals pursuant to the Board’s standards and regulations as required by § 22.1-7.

The Board shall promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to conform these programs with the applicable federal and state laws and regulations including teacher/student ratios and special education requirements for children with disabilities. The education programs in the relevant detention homes and state agencies and institutions shall be approved by the Board, and the Board shall prepare a budget for these educational programs that shall be solely supported by such general funds as are appropriated by the General Assembly for this purpose. Teacher staffing ratios for regional or local detention homes shall be based on a ratio of one teacher for every 12 beds based on the capacity of the facility; however, if the previous year’s average daily attendance exceeds this bed capacity, the ratio shall be based on the average daily attendance at the facility as calculated by the Department from the previous school year.

The Board shall enter into contracts with the relevant state agency or institution or detention facility or the local school divisions in which the state agencies or institutions or the regional detention homes and the relevant local detention homes are located for the hiring and supervision of teachers.

In any case in which the Board enters into a contract with the relevant state agency or institution, the Department of Human Resource Management shall establish salary schedules for the teachers that are competitive with those in effect for the school divisions in which the agency or institution is located.

History.

1987, c. 414; 1992, cc. 209, 439; 1994, c. 854; 2000, cc. 66, 657, 865; 2002, cc. 87, 478; 2008, cc. 46, 151; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2022, c. 355.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 66 and 657 are identical, and substituted “Department of Human Resource Management” for “Department of Personnel and Training” in the fourth paragraph.

The 2000 amendment by c. 865 added the last sentence of the second paragraph.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by c. 87, effective March 4, 2002, and c. 478, effective April 3, 2002, are identical, and substituted “the Eastern Virginia Medical School, the Virginia Commonwealth University Health System Authority” for “the Medical College of Hampton Roads, the Medical College of Virginia Hospitals” near the end of the last sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by c. 46, effective February 29, 2008, and c. 151, effective March 2, 2008, are identical, and inserted “the children’s teaching hospital associated with the Virginia Commonwealth University Health System Authority” in the last sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse” in the second sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 355 in the first paragraph in the first sentence and in the third paragraph, deleted “of Education” following “Board”; deleted “having teachers whose salaries were being funded by the Commonwealth on January 1, 1984” following “local detention homes” in the first paragraph; in the second paragraph, deleted “but not limited to” preceding “teacher/student ratios” and “of Education” following “Department”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 22.1-210.
Night schools.

Any school board may, in its discretion, establish and conduct night schools to which may be admitted pupils, regardless of age.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-222; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-211.
Operation of vacation schools and summer camps by school boards.

Any school board or any two or more school boards acting in conjunction may establish and operate or cause to be established and operated, for the benefit of persons of school age, vacation schools or camps for the advancement of education, physical training, health, nutrition, the prevention of communicable diseases, or for any other purpose deemed by such board or boards to be beneficial to persons of school age requiring special training or attention or which will promote the efficiency of their respective school systems.

Such school board or boards may expend such sum or sums as may be reasonable and requisite for such purposes or may provide such sum or sums and permit the proper use of any school property, under reasonable safeguards, for the establishment and operation of a vacation school or camp conducted under the auspices and supervision of any other governmental agency approved by such school board or boards, for the benefit of persons of school age within the jurisdiction of such board or boards. Such activity shall have been included in the estimate of money deemed to be needed for public schools for the year in which such expenditure is made.

The establishment and operation of such school or camp shall also be approved, as to conditions affecting sanitation and safety, by the health authorities having jurisdiction of the area in which such vacation school or camp is located and conducted. Any vacation school or camp operated by such school board or boards or any other local agency, department or board shall be available to persons of school age within the applicable jurisdiction on a nondiscriminatory basis regardless of whether they attend public or private schools.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-55; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 79, § 1; 1973, c. 101; 1980, c. 559; 1989, c. 277; 1995, c. 244.

§ 22.1-212.
(Repealed) Vacation schools and summer camps operated by Board or Department.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-21.3; 1973, c. 101; 1980, c. 559; 1989, c. 277; 1995, c. 244; repealed by 2022, c. 355.

§ 22.1-212.1.
Obligations of school boards.

Pursuant to §

1-511

, school boards shall have no obligation to teach the standard curriculum, except courses in foreign languages, in a language other than English. School boards shall endeavor to provide instruction in the English language which shall be designed to promote the education of students for whom English is a second language.

History.

1981, c. 185; 1986, c. 466; 1996, c. 829; 2005, c. 839.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 839, effective October 1, 2005, substituted “1-511” for “7.1-42” in the first sentence.

§ 22.1-212.1:1.
Single-sex education.

Consistent with constitutional principles, a school board may establish a single-sex school or class in the school division, if the school board makes available to pupils substantially equal coeducational schools or classes. Participation in such single-sex school or class shall not be required by the school division, and the school board shall ensure that participation by pupils in the single-sex school or class is voluntary. For the purposes of this section, participation by a pupil in a single-sex school or class is voluntary only if the school division also makes available to the pupil a substantially equal coeducational school or class.

History.

1995, c. 582; 2009, c. 84.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 84, in the first sentence, substituted “a single-sex school or class in the” for “single-sex classes in the public schools of the” and added the language beginning “if the school board” at the end and added the last two sentences.